West Virginia, session 2025, HB2222.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of Administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. Department of Administration. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 27, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-8-8 of this code, relating to the Department of Administration (general administration of records management and preservation, 148 CSR 12), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 27, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-8-8 of this code, relating to the Department of Administration (retention and disposal scheduling, (148 CSR 13), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 27, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-8-8 of this code, relating to the Department of Administration (management of records maintained by the Records Center, 148 CSR 14), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on April 30, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-12-9 of this code, relating to the Department of Administration (exemptions from management services provided by the Fleet Management Division, 148 CSR 23), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 11, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-2B-2 of this code, relating to the Department of Administration (financial services reporting, 148 CSR 24), is authorized. §64-2-2. Information Services and Communications Division. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on November 12, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-7-2 of this code, relating to the Information Services and Communications Division (plan of operation, 161 CSR 01), is authorized. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on November 12, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-7-4 of this code, relating to the Information Services and Communications Divisions (telecommunications payments made by state spending units, 161 CSR 02), is authorized. §64-2-3. Office of Technology. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 29, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-6-4 of this code, modified by the Office of Technology to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 11, 2024, relating to the Office of Technology (plan of operation, 163 CSR 04), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 29, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-6-4 of this code, modified by the Office of Technology to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 11, 2024, relating to the Office of Technology (telecommunications payments made by state spending units, 163 CSR 05), is authorized. §64-2-4. Public Defender Services. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 19, 2024, authorized under the authority of §29-21-5 of this code, relating to the Public Defender Services (payment of fees and reimbursement of expenses of court-appointed attorneys, 89 CSR 01), is authorized.